Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.080

Request for notice.

(1) A person may file with the court a request for notice under this chapter if the person is:

(a) Not otherwise entitled to notice; and

(b) Interested in the welfare of a respondent, individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship, or individual subject to a protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter.

(2) A request under subsection (1) of this section must include a statement showing the interest of the person making the request and the address of the person or an attorney for the person to whom notice is to be given.

(3) If the court approves a request under subsection (1) of this section, the approved individual shall give notice of the approval to the guardian or conservator, if one has been appointed, or the respondent if no guardian or conservator has been appointed.

[ 2020 c 312 s 312; 2019 c 437 s 116.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.